Florida, session 2026, SB936.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 553.8951, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 553.8951âTemporary door locking devices.â 19 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âtemporary door 20 locking deviceâ means a device that prevents a door from opening 21 and meets all of the following criteria: 22 (a)âIs meant only for temporary use during an emergency 23 situation. 24 (b)âCan be engaged or removed without opening the door. 25 (c)âCan be engaged and removed from the egress side of the 26 door without the use of a key and can be removed from the 27 ingress side of the door with the use of a key or other 28 credential. 29 (d)âDoes not modify the door closer, panic hardware, or 30 fire exit hardware. 31 (e)âIs not permanently mounted to the door assembly. 32 However, individual parts of the temporary door locking device, 33 including, but not limited to, bolts, stops, brackets, or pins, 34 which do not prevent normal ingress and egress through the door, 35 may be permanently mounted to the door. 36 (f)âDoes not affect the fire rating of the door and 37 complies with the fire rating standards of the National Fire 38 Protection Association. 39 (g)âCan be removed with a single operation when engaged. 40 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law or provision, a temporary 41 door locking device may be installed at any height above the 42 finished floor. 43 (3)âThe Florida Building Commission shall incorporate into 44 the Florida Building Code pursuant to s. 553.73(1) standards for 45 temporary door locking devices that meet the requirements of 46 this section. A temporary door locking device may be used to 47 secure a fire exit or an entranceway leading to a fire exit if 48 the temporary door locking device is used only during an 49 emergency situation and approved by the local enforcement agency 50 that has jurisdiction over the building in which the device is 51 installed. A temporary door locking device may be applied only 52 for a finite period of time during an emergency situation, 53 including, but not limited to, a shelter-in-place order, an 54 emergency lockdown, or a safety drill for such emergency 55 situation. 56 (4)âThe use of a temporary door locking device must be 57 integrated into building safety plans, safety drills, and 58 training programs so that the employees or staff of the building 59 in which the device is installed has inservice training on the 60 use of the temporary door locking device. 61 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.